Wisconsin, session 2025, SB198.
do enact as follows:SB198,11Section 1. 16.54 (2) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB198,2,13216.54 (2) (a) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2. and sub. (14), whenever funds 3shall be made available to this state through an act of congress and the funds are 4accepted as provided in sub. (1), the governor shall designate the state board, 5commission, or department to administer any of such funds, and the board, 6commission, or department so designated by the governor is authorized and 7directed to administer such funds for the purpose designated by the act of congress 8making an appropriation of such funds, or by the department of the United States 9government making such funds available to this state. Whenever a block grant is 10made to this state, no moneys received as a part of the block grant may be 11transferred from use as a part of one such grant to use as a part of another such 12grant, regardless of whether a transfer between appropriations is required, unless 13the joint committee on finance approves the transfer.SB198,214Section 2. 16.54 (14) of the statutes is created to read:SB198,2,191516.54 (14) (a) In this subsection, “benefit augmentation” means for any state 16agency or official, including the governor, to encumber or expend moneys received 17from, or accept reimbursement from, the federal government or for any state agency 18or official, including the governor, to enter into any contract or agreement with the 19federal government or any federal agency, to do any of the following:SB198,3,5201. Increase the weekly unemployment insurance benefit rate payable to 1claimants to a rate that is higher than what is provided under s. 108.05, including 2by providing any stipend or other benefit separately from unemployment insurance 3benefits, if eligibility for that stipend or benefit is determined, in whole or in part, 4based on an individual’s receipt of, or eligibility for, unemployment insurance 5benefits.SB198,3,962. Increase the total amount of unemployment insurance benefits to which a 7claimant is entitled to an amount that is greater than what is provided under s. 8108.06 (2), including by providing an increased overall benefit entitlement or 9additional weeks of benefits.SB198,4,510(b) 1. Whenever any benefit augmentation is provided for through an act of 11congress or by executive action of the president of the United States, the governor or 12other state official or state agency shall notify the cochairpersons of the joint 13committee on finance, in writing, of the proposed benefit augmentation. The notice 14shall contain a detailed description of the proposed benefit augmentation, an 15affirmative statement that the proposed benefit augmentation complies with subd. 162., and, if the proposed benefit augmentation requires any contract or agreement 17with the federal government or any federal agency, a copy of the proposed contract 18or agreement if available. If the cochairpersons of the committee do not notify the 19governor, official, or agency that the committee has scheduled a meeting for the 20purpose of reviewing the proposed benefit augmentation within 7 working days 21after the date of the governor’s, official’s, or agency’s notification, the benefit 22augmentation may, subject to subd. 2., be effectuated as proposed by the governor, 23official, or agency. If, within 7 working days after the date of the governor’s, 1official’s, or agency’s notification, the cochairpersons of the committee notify the 2governor, official, or agency that the committee has scheduled a meeting for the 3purpose of reviewing the proposed benefit augmentation, the benefit augmentation 4may not be effectuated without the approval of the committee. The committee may 5not approve a proposed benefit augmentation unless it complies with subd. 2.SB198,4,762. No benefit augmentation may be effectuated unless it is subject to 7termination or cancellation by the joint committee on finance.SB198,4,98(c) This subsection does not apply with respect to federal extended benefits 9under s. 108.141.SB198,310Section 3. 108.04 (2) (a) 4. of the statutes is renumbered 108.04 (2) (a) 4. 11(intro.) and amended to read:SB198,4,1312108.04 (2) (a) 4. (intro.) If the claimant is claiming benefits for a week other 13than an initial week, the claimant provides does all of the following:SB198,4,1514a. Provides information or job application materials that are requested by the 15department and participates.SB198,4,1816b. Participates in a public employment office workshop or training program or 17in similar reemployment services that are required by the department under sub. 18(15) (a) 2.SB198,419Section 4. 108.04 (2) (a) 4. c. of the statutes is created to read:SB198,4,2220108.04 (2) (a) 4. c. Registers on his or her local job center website or with his 21or her labor market exchange, if the claimant resides outside this state. The 22department shall verify that each such claimant has complied with this subd. 4. c.SB198,523Section 5. 108.04 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB198,5,91108.04 (5) (b) Theft or unauthorized possession of an employer’s property or, 2theft of an employer’s services with intent to deprive the employer of the property or 3services permanently, theft or unauthorized distribution of an employer’s 4confidential or proprietary information, use of an employer’s credit card or other 5financial instrument for an unauthorized or nonbusiness purpose without prior 6approval from the employer, theft of currency of any value, felonious conduct 7connected with an employee’s employment with his or her employer, or intentional 8or negligent conduct by an employee that causes the destruction of an employer’s 9records or substantial damage to his or her an employer’s property.SB198,610Section 6. 108.04 (5) (e) (intro.) of the statutes is created to read:SB198,5,1111108.04 (5) (e) (intro.) Any of the following:SB198,712Section 7. 108.04 (5) (e) of the statutes is renumbered 108.04 (5) (e) 1. and 13amended to read:SB198,5,2314108.04 (5) (e) 1. Absenteeism by an employee on more than 2 occasions within 15the 120-day period before the date of the employee’s termination, unless otherwise 16specified by his or her employer if the employee does not provide to his or her 17employer both notice and one or more valid reasons for the absenteeism. This 18subdivision does not apply if the employer has a reasonable policy that covers 19absenteeism described in subd. 2. in an employment manual of which the employee 20has acknowledged receipt with his or her signature, or excessive tardiness by an 21employee in violation of a policy of the employer that has been communicated to the 22employee, if the employee does not provide to his or her employer both notice and 23one or more valid reasons for the absenteeism or tardiness.SB198,81Section 8. 108.04 (5) (e) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB198,6,62108.04 (5) (e) 2. A violation of an employer’s reasonable policy that covers 3employee absenteeism, tardiness, or both, and that results in an employee’s 4termination, if that termination is in accordance with that policy and the policy is 5specified by the employer in an employment manual of which the employee has 6acknowledged receipt with his or her signature.SB198,97Section 9. 108.04 (5) (h) of the statutes is created to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb198 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb198 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB198 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB198 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB198: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting